Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3154
Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities Support Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3154 to 77-3162 shall be known and may be cited as the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities Support Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 34.